Hawaii statutes.
§414D-244 Revocation of dissolution.
(a) A corporation may revoke its dissolution within one hundred twenty days of
its effective date.

(b) Revocation of dissolution shall be
authorized in the same manner as the dissolution was authorized unless that
authorization permitted revocation by action of the board of directors alone,
in which event the board of directors may revoke the dissolution without action
by the members or any other person.

(c) After the revocation of dissolution is
authorized, the corporation may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the
department director for filing articles of revocation of dissolution, together
with a copy of its articles of dissolution, that set forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The effective date of the dissolution that was
revoked;

(3) The date that the revocation of dissolution was
authorized;

(4) If the corporation's board of directors (or
incorporators) revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect;

(5) If the corporation's board of directors revoked a
dissolution authorized by the members alone or in conjunction with another
person or persons, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the
board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

(6) If member or third person action was required to
revoke the dissolution, the information required by section 414D-243(a)(5) or
(6).

(d) Within the applicable revocation of
dissolution period, should the name of the corporation, or a name substantially
identical thereto, be registered or reserved by another corporation,
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, or limited
liability partnership, or should the name or a name substantially identical
thereto be registered as a trade name, trademark, or service mark, then
revocation of dissolution shall be allowed only upon the registration of a new
name by the dissolved corporation pursuant to the amendment provisions of this
chapter.

(e) Revocation of dissolution is effective
upon the effective date of the articles of revocation of dissolution.

(f) When the revocation of dissolution is
effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the
dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its activities as if
dissolution had never occurred. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130,
§59; am L 2004, c 121, §19]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next